Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
PART 1 Georgia State Indemnification Fund
45-9-90.
Giving false information or testimony.

Any person who shall knowingly give false information or false testimony causing or intended to cause the payment of indemnification which would not otherwise be justified under this part shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

Any such person convicted under subsection (a) of this Code section shall be liable to the state for any funds paid as a result of such false information or testimony.

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 1914, § 11; Ga. L. 2000, p. 283, § 1; Code 1981, §

45-9-90

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2008, p. 470, § 1/SB 254.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 283, § 3, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that the 2000 amendment became effective July 1, 2001, only upon ratification of a constitutional amendment by the voters at the November 2000 general election. The constitutional amendment (Ga. L. 2000, p. 1999) was approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting at the general election held on November 7, 2000.

Ga. L. 2008, p. 470, § 2/SB 254, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section shall apply to all incidents occurring on or after July 1, 2008.

45-9-91.
Redesignated.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2008, p. 470, § 1, effective July 1, 2008, redesignated former Code Section 45-9-91 as present Code Section 45-9-90.